Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.170

Procedure upon change of name or business location.

Whenever a licensee shall contemplate a change of his, her, or its trade name or a change in the location of his, her, or its principal place of business or branch office, he, she, or it shall give written notice of such proposed change to the director. The director shall approve the proposed change and issue a new license or a branch office certificate, as the case may be, reflecting the change.

[ 2011 c 336 s 512; 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 8.]